Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.355

Continuity of corporate existence.

Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation of a converted savings bank with the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 32.32.485, the corporate existence of the mutual savings bank converting to a stock savings bank pursuant to this chapter shall not terminate but the converted savings bank shall be deemed to be a continuation of the entity of the mutual savings bank so converted having the same rights and obligations as it had prior to the conversion.

[ 1981 c 85 s 70.]